Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201268-965
Autism Treatment
Program Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1)
The Autism Treatment Program Cash Fund is created. The fund shall include revenue received from gifts, grants,
bequests, donations, other similar donation arrangements, or other contributions
from public or private sources. The department shall administer the fund.
The fund shall
be used as the state's matching share for the waiver established under section
68-966 and for expenses incurred in the administration of the Autism Treatment
Program. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) The program shall utilize private funds deposited in the fund. No
donations from a provider of services under Title XIX of the federal Social
Security Act shall be deposited into the fund.

Laws 2007, LB482, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1,141;

Laws 2009, LB27, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB969, § 8.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.